Georgia statutes. TITLE 12 CONSERVATION AND NATURAL RESOURCES
PART 9
G

EORGIA AGRICULTURAL EXPOSITION AUTHORITY OVERVIEW COMMITTEE

12-3-500. Creation of committee; membership; vacancies; review of Georgia Agricultural Exposition Authority.

There is created as a joint committee of the General Assembly the Georgia Agricultural Exposition Authority Overview Committee to be composed of five members of the House of Representatives appointed by the Speaker of the House and five members of the Senate appointed by the President of the Senate. The members of the committee shall serve two-year terms concurrent with their terms as members of the General Assembly. The chairman of the committee shall be appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives from the membership of the committee, and the vice chairman of the committee shall be appointed by the President of the Senate from the membership of the committee. The chairman and vice chairman shall serve terms of two years concurrent with their terms as members of the General Assembly. Vacancies in an appointed member's position or in the offices of chairman or vice chairman of the committee shall be filled for the unexpired term in the same manner as the original appointment. The committee shall periodically inquire into and review the operations of the Georgia Agricultural Exposition Authority, as well as periodically review and evaluate the success with which the authority is accomplishing its statutory duties and functions as provided in this article.

(Code 1981, §

12-3-500

, enacted by Ga. L. 1985, p. 1110, § 1.)

12-3-501. Assistance to committee in discharging duties; employees; securing professional services.

The state auditor, the Attorney General, and all other agencies of state government, upon request by the committee, shall assist the committee in the discharge of its duties as set forth in this part. The committee may employ not more than two staff members and may secure the services of independent accountants, engineers, and consultants.

(Code 1981, §

12-3-501

, enacted by Ga. L. 1985, p. 1110, § 1.)

12-3-502. Cooperation of Georgia Agricultural Exposition Authority.

The Georgia Agricultural Exposition Authority shall cooperate with the committee, its authorized personnel, the Attorney General, the state auditor, the state accounting officer, and other state agencies in order that the charges of the committee, set forth in this part, may be timely and efficiently discharged. The authority shall submit to the committee such reports and data as the committee shall reasonably require of the authority in order that the committee may adequately perform its functions. The Attorney General is authorized to bring appropriate legal actions to enforce any laws specifically or generally relating to the Georgia Agricultural Exposition Authority. The committee shall, on or before the first day of January of each year, and at such other times as it deems necessary, submit to the General Assembly a report of its findings and recommendations based upon the review of the Georgia Agricultural Exposition Authority, as set forth in this part.

(Code 1981, §

12-3-502

, enacted by Ga. L. 1985, p. 1110, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 8, § 12; Ga. L. 2005, p. 694, § 22/HB 293.)

12-3-503. Committee to evaluate performance of authority.

In the discharge of its duties, the committee shall evaluate the performance of the Georgia Agricultural Exposition Authority consistent with the following criteria:

Prudent, legal, and accountable expenditure of public funds;

Efficient operation; and

Performance of its statutory responsibilities.

(Code 1981, §

12-3-503

, enacted by Ga. L. 1985, p. 1110, § 1.)

12-3-504. Expenditure of state funds by committee; compensation, expenses, and allowances for members.

The committee is authorized to expend state funds available to the committee for the discharge of its duties. Said funds may be used for the purposes of compensating staff personnel, paying for services of independent accountants, engineers, and consultants, and paying all other necessary expenses incurred by the committee in performing its duties.

The members of the committee shall receive the same compensation, per diem, expenses, and allowances for their service on the committee as is authorized by law for members of interim legislative study committees.

The funds necessary for the purposes of the committee shall come from the funds appropriated to and available to the legislative branch of government.

(Code 1981, §

12-3-504

, enacted by Ga. L. 1985, p. 1110, § 1.)